Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Definitions

§ 13-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act, unless another definition is specifically provided for a section, article or chapter of this act:

“Bank” means any corporation, excluding national banks, having a place of business within this state which engages in banking business, and includes a special purpose depository institution, subject to the limitations set forth in W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

;

“Banking business” means opening credits by the deposit or collection of money or negotiable paper subject to be paid upon draft, receipt, check or order;

“Bank holding company” means a company that is a bank holding company under the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 1841, et seq., and unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of W.S.

13-2-802

through

13-2-810

and

13-9-306

through

13-9-316

includes a Wyoming bank holding company, an out-of-state bank holding company and a foreign bank holding company;

“Board” means the state banking board;

“Commissioner” means the state banking commissioner;

“Customer” means any person having an account with a bank or for whom a bank has agreed to collect items including a bank carrying an account with another bank;

“Director” means the director of the state department of audit;

“Executive officer” means a person who participates or has authority to participate, other than in the capacity of a director, in major policymaking functions of the company or bank, whether or not the officer has an official title, the title designates the officer an assistant, or the officer is serving without salary or other compensation. The chairman of the board, the president, every vice president, the cashier, the secretary and the treasurer of a company or bank are considered executive officers, unless the officer is excluded, by resolution of the board of directors or by the bylaws of the bank or company, from participation, other than in the capacity of a director, in major policymaking functions of the bank or company, and the officer does not actually participate therein. An executive officer of a bank includes an executive officer of a bank holding company of which the bank is a subsidiary and any other subsidiary of that bank holding company, unless the executive officer of the subsidiary is excluded, by name or by title, from participation in major policymaking functions of the bank by resolutions of the boards of directors of both the subsidiary and the bank, and does not actually participate in such major policymaking functions;

“Financial institution” means a bank, savings and loan association, trust company or state chartered credit union;

“Instrument” means a negotiable instrument as defined by W.S. 34.1-3-104;

“Legal holiday” means:

Any day of public thanksgiving, mourning or disaster proclaimed or appointed by the governor or president of the United States;

A day designated a holiday by W.S.

8-4-101

;

Sundays; and

Any day on which the federal reserve banks are closed for business.

“National banking association” or “national bank” means a banking association chartered by the United States;

“Officer” means any person designated an officer by the bylaws of a bank including any executive officer, the chairman of the board of directors, the chairman of the executive committee, the president, vice-president, cashier and any trust officer, assistant vice-president, assistant treasurer, assistant cashier, assistant comptroller or any person who performs the duties appropriate to those offices;

“This act” unless otherwise indicated means W.S.

13-1-101

through

13-11-101

;

“Trust business” means the holding out by a person to the public at large by advertising, solicitation or other means that such person is available to act as an executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or trustee in this state and accepting and undertaking to perform the duties in such a capacity in the regular course of his business;

“Special purpose depository institution” means a corporation operating pursuant to W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 5, 10; 1929, ch. 54, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-105, 10-110; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1; 1937, ch. 86, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-106, 35-111, 35-701, 35-801; Laws 1955, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-1, 13-2, 13-107, 13-176, 13-184; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 177, § 2; 1979, ch. 71, § 1; 1991, ch. 175, § 2; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 115, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; 2003, ch. 16, § 1; 2013 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to providing identifying information for a noncustodial parent who maintains an account at the institution and has been identified as owing past-due child support, see §

13-1-205

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “13-2-802” for “13-2-801” in (a)(iii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, in (a)(i), added “and includes a special purpose depository institution, subject to the limitations set forth in W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

,” and added (a)(xvi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

Wyoming Trust & Mgt. v. Bonham, 694 P.2d 106,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 430

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Wilde v. Amoretti Lodge Co., 47 Wyo. 505, 41 P.2d 508,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1935).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “officer, director, agent, or employee” of bank, or is “connected in any capacity” with bank and therefore subject to prosecution and punishment for misapplication of bank funds under 18 USC § 656, 57 ALR Fed 537.